Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB428.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Artist Fellowship Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Council." The Pennsylvania Council on the Arts."Eligible individual." An individual who meets the eligibility requirements under section 5."Grant." Financial assistance for a fellowship under the program.1234567891011121314151617 "Program." The Pennsylvania Artist Fellowship Grant Program established under section 3.Section 3. Establishment and purposes of program.The Pennsylvania Artist Fellowship Grant Program is established within the council to provide grants in accordance with this act to artists in this Commonwealth for the following purposes:(1) To enable artists to demonstrate or continue demonstrating their talents and skills in producing or presenting artistic projects or programs in this Commonwealth.(2) To foster artistic growth and sustain artistic practice.(3) To encourage artists to relocate to or remain in this Commonwealth.(4) To support prestigious fellowships as an investment to foster, build and improve communities in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Administration.The council shall implement and administer the program and shall develop the following in accordance with this act:(1) An application form for a grant, which must:(i) Include eligibility criteria, deadlines and information to be submitted, such as contact information, proof of eligibility as described in section 5 and the proposed uses of the grant.(ii) Be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the council.(2) A process for the following:(i) The submittal and review of a completed 20250HB0428PN0396 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application form for a grant, including a timeline for making a determination to award the grant and notice of the award of the grant.(ii) The disbursement of a grant.(iii) The general management of the program, including the maintenance of records regarding grants.Section 5. Eligibility.An individual shall be eligible for a grant if the individual satisfies all of the following criteria:(1) Is 18 years of age or older.(2) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(3) Is a visual, media, film or performing artist who provides evidence of regular creative practice.(4) Produces or presents projects or programs that are relevant to the community and accessible to the public in this Commonwealth.(5) Is not enrolled in a high school, undergraduate or graduate degree program.Section 6. Use of grant.(a) Permissible uses.--A grant may be used to defray costs, fees or other expenses regarding any of the following:(1) Administration.(2) Consultant services.(3) Contractual services.(4) Daycare services.(5) Entries.(6) Equipment rental.(7) Exhibitions.(8) Financial tools or planning.(9) Food.20250HB0428PN0396 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) Housing.(11) Insurance.(12) Studios or workspaces.(13) Materials or supplies.(14) Marketing.(15) Medical services.(16) Goods or services provided by technical crews, fabricators or collaborators.(17) Professional memberships.(18) Performances or production.(19) Student loans.(20) Submissions for grants or residency applications.(21) Travel or transportation.(22) Utilities.(23) Website development.(b) Prohibited uses.--A grant may not be used for any of the following purposes:(1) To compensate activities performed as part of regular, continuing employment.(2) To make contributions to any of the following:(i) An individual who holds, or is a candidate for, elected office.(ii) A political party, organization or action committee.(3) In connection with a political campaign or referendum.(4) Lobbying activities.Section 7. Award of grant.(a) Nature and amount.--Except as provided in subsection (b), after the review of submitted applications for grants, the 20250HB0428PN0396 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 council shall award grants on an annual basis in the amount of $100,000 to not more than 25 eligible individuals.(b) Limitations.--(1) The duration of a grant shall be one year.(2) An eligible individual may apply once every two years for a grant.(3) An individual may receive a grant only once.Section 8. Funding.(a) Appropriation.--Upon the effective date of this subsection:(1) The amount of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the council for the award of grants.(2) The amount of $250,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the council for administrative costs associated with the implementation and administration of the program.(b) Effect.--The appropriations made under subsection (a) shall supplement and not supplant any other money appropriated to the council for grants or administrative costs or similar purposes.(c) Nonlapse.--The appropriations made under subsection (a) shall not lapse and shall remain available until expended.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0428PN0396 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324